Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5491.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
16-21-43. Seizure safe schools.
(a) "Seizure action plan" means a standardized written, individualized health plan designed
to acknowledge and prepare for the healthcare needs of a student diagnosed with a seizure disorder.
The parent or guardian of each student diagnosed with a seizure disorder shall collaborate with
their child's physician as well as the school nurse teacher to create an individualized seizure action
plan. The seizure action plan shall include:
(1) Assurance of access and administration of any medication prescribed to treat seizure
disorder symptoms as approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration or any
successor agency; and
(2) Physician instructions in administering seizure medications, and manual vagus nerve
stimulation, as well as the recognition of the signs and symptoms of seizures and the appropriate
steps to be taken to respond to these symptoms
(b) Prior to administering medication prescribed to treat seizure disorder symptoms, the
student's parent or guardian shall:
(1) Provide the school with a written authorization to administer the medication at school;
(2) Provide a written statement from the student's healthcare practitioner, which shall
contain the following information:

(i) Student's name;
(ii) The name and purpose of the medication;
(iii) The prescribed dosage;
(iv) The route of administration;
(v) The frequency that the medication may be administered; and
(vi) The circumstances under which the medication may be administered; and
(3) Provide the prescribed medication to the school in its unopened, sealed package with
the label affixed by the dispensing pharmacy intact.
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing procedures for the development and content of seizure action plans.
16-21-44. Requirements for administration of seizure rescue medications in a school
setting.
(a) The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of health
shall incorporate into their policies, rules and regulations for administration of seizure rescue
medications that are applied via nasal route to provide for the health and safety of children who
have been medically identified as having epilepsy/seizure disorder. The policies, rules and
regulations shall include procedures whereby:
(1) A parent or legal guardian of any child may expressly authorize school employees or
those employed on behalf of the school, for when there is no school nurse immediately available,
to administer a United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approved seizure rescue
medication on such child in case of an emergency, while at school or school sponsored activities.
Any school employee or those employed on behalf of the school who are authorized to administer
seizure rescue medications shall be trained in seizure first aid using the Epilepsy Foundation
Seizure Training for School Personnel Program and American Heart Association or American Red
Cross CPR certification;
(2) The pre-dosed and pre-packaged seizure rescue medication shall be kept in a locked,
secure, designated area, readily available;
(3) Seizure rescue medication administration training may be provided by a licensed
physician, physician assistant, advanced practiced registered nurse, or registered nurse; provided
however, in no case shall school nurse teachers be required to provide training; and
(4) The school administration shall allow staff to voluntarily assist with the emergency
administration of a seizure rescue medication when authorized by a parent or legal guardian.
(b) A school employee, including administrative staff, shall not be subject to penalty or
disciplinary action for refusing to be trained in the administration of a seizure rescue medication.
LC001557 - Page 2 of 5

(c) A parent or legal guardian shall provide a seizure action plan or physician’s order,
signed by the student's healthcare provider, that prescribes the care and assistance needed by the
student including administration of seizure rescue medications.
(d) The statements and seizure action plan required by this section shall be kept on file in
the office of the school nurse and/or school administrator and with the individual authorized to
administer the seizure rescue medication.
(e) The seizure action plan required by this section shall be distributed to any school
personnel or volunteers, identified in the seizure action plan, who is responsible for the supervision
or care of the student with a seizure disorder. A student’s parent/guardian shall distribute the
authorized seizure action plan required by this section to any non-school personnel identified in the
seizure action plan, who is responsible for the supervision or care of the student with a seizure
disorder.
(f) The presence of a registered nurse employed full-time by a school who assumes
responsibility for the administration of seizure medications, and the administration oversight of
vagus nerve stimulation, shall fulfill the requirements of this section.
(g)(1) Every public, private and parochial school or school district shall provide training to
principals, guidance counselors, teachers, and other relevant school personnel with direct contact
and supervision of children, including bus drivers and classroom aides, on the recognition of the
signs and symptoms of seizures and the appropriate steps for seizure first aid.
(2) Any training program or guideline adopted by any state agency for the training of school
personnel in the healthcare needs of students diagnosed with a seizure disorder shall be fully
consistent with training programs and guidelines developed by the Epilepsy Foundation of America
or any successor organization. Notwithstanding any state agency requirement or other law to the
contrary, for the purposes of this training, a local school district shall be permitted to use any
adequate and appropriate training program or guidelines for training of school personnel in the
seizure disorder care tasks covered under this section.
(h) The permission for the administration of any of the medications listed under this section
shall be effective for the school year in which it is granted and shall be renewed each following
school year upon fulfilling the requirements of this section.
(i) The requirements of this section shall apply only to schools that have a student enrolled
who has a seizure disorder or has a seizure medication prescribed to treat seizure disorder symptoms
approved by the FDA or any successor agency prescribed by the student's healthcare provider.
(j) Every public, private and parochial school or school district shall provide an age-
appropriate seizure education program to all students on seizures and seizure disorders. The seizure
LC001557 - Page 3 of 5

education program shall be consistent with guidelines published by the Epilepsy Foundation of
America or any successor organization. The department of elementary and secondary education
shall promulgate administrative rules and regulations for the development and implementation of
the seizure education program.
(k) A school district, school district employee, or agent acting in good faith and in
substantial compliance with the student's individual health plan, including a seizure action plan,
and the instructions of the student's licensed healthcare professional, that provides assistance or
services under this section shall not be liable for civil damages in their individual, marital,
governmental, corporate, or other capacities as a result of the services provided under this section
to students with epilepsy or seizure disorders.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001557
========
LC001557 - Page 4 of 5